Hawaii statutes.
[§432D-21] Confidentiality of medical
information. Any data or information pertaining to the diagnosis,
treatment, or health of any enrollee or applicant obtained from such person or
from any provider by any health maintenance organization shall be held in
confidence and shall not be disclosed to any person except to the extent that
it may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, upon the express
consent of the enrollee or applicant, pursuant to statute or court order for
the production of evidence or the discovery thereof, or in the event of a claim
or litigation between such person and the health maintenance organization
wherein such data or information is pertinent. A health maintenance
organization shall be entitled to claim any statutory privileges against
disclosure which the provider who furnished the information to the health
maintenance organization is entitled to claim. [L 1995, c 179, pt of §1]

Law Journals and Reviews

Driving into the Sunset: A Proposal for Mandatory Reporting
to the DMV by Physicians Treating Unsafe Elderly Drivers. 25 UH L. Rev. 59.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next